Colorado, session 2026A, SB175.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 8-44-109.5 as
follows:
8-44-109.5. Experience modification factor - adjustment.
(1) (a) EACH INSURANCE CARRIER AUTHORIZED TO TRANSACT
BUSINESS IN THIS STATE, INCLUDING PINNACOL ASSURANCE, THAT INSURES
AN EMPLOYER AGAINST LIABILITY FOR COMPENSATION UNDER ARTICLES 40
TO 47 OF THIS TITLE 8 UPON NOTIFICATION BY AN EMPLOYER OR A LICENSED
INSURANCE PRODUCER SHALL NOTIFY THE EMPLOYER'S AUTHORIZED RATING
ORGANIZATION TO REVISE THE EMPLOYER'S EXPERIENCE MODIFICATION
FACTOR TO REFLECT THE ACTUAL DOLLAR AMOUNT PAID FOR A CLOSED
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

CLAIM INSTEAD OF THE ACTUAL DOLLAR AMOUNT PAID PLUS RESERVES
DETERMINED PRIOR TO THE CLOSURE OF THE CLAIM.
(b) THE EMPLOYER OR LICENSED INSURANCE PRODUCER MUST
NOTIFY THE INSURANCE CARRIER BETWEEN THE TIME THE CLAIM IS
REPORTED TO A RATING BUREAU AND THIRTY-ONE DAYS AFTER THE
EMPLOYER'S RATING EFFECTIVE DATE.
(2) AN EMPLOYER OR LICENSED INSURANCE PRODUCER MAY NOTIFY
AN INSURANCE CARRIER TO MODIFY AN EXPERIENCE MODIFICATION FACTOR
PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION ONLY WHEN:
(a) AN OPEN CLAIM IS REPORTED BY THE INSURANCE CARRIER TO THE
RATING BUREAU WITH A HIGHER OPEN CLAIM AMOUNT THAN THE AMOUNT
AFTER THE CLAIM WAS CLOSED; AND
(b) THE LOWER CLAIM AMOUNT WOULD REDUCE AN EMPLOYER'S
EXPERIENCE MODIFICATION FACTOR:
(I) AT LEAST .05 COMPARED TO THE PREVIOUSLY RELEASED
EXPERIENCE MODIFICATION FACTOR; OR
(II) FROM ABOVE 1.0 TO 1.0 OR BELOW.
(3) THE AUTHORIZED RATING ORGANIZATION SHALL ADJUST THE
EXPERIENCE MODIFICATION FACTOR WITHIN THIRTY DAYS AFTER
NOTIFICATION FROM THE INSURANCE CARRIER PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (1)
OF THIS SECTION. THE INSURANCE CARRIER SHALL CREDIT AN EMPLOYER FOR
A PREMIUM CHANGE CALCULATED AS A RESULT OF THE UPDATED
EXPERIENCE MODIFICATION FACTOR WITHIN THE EMPLOYER'S POLICY PERIOD.
SECTION 2. Act subject to petition - effective date -
applicability. (1) This act takes effect January 1, 2027; except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state
constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act within the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly, then the
act, item, section, or part will not take effect unless approved by the people
at the general election to be held in November 2026 and, in such case, will
take effect January 1, 2027, or on the date of the official declaration of the
vote thereon by the governor, whichever is later.
PAGE 2-SENATE BILL 26-175

(2) This act applies to claims closed on or after the applicable
effective date of this act.
____________________________ ____________________________
James Rashad Coleman, Sr. Julie McCluskie
PRESIDENT OF SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
____________________________ ____________________________
Esther van Mourik Vanessa Reilly
SECRETARY OF CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 3-SENATE BILL 26-175